Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.090

Validation of prior bankruptcy proceedings.

In the event that any taxing district in the state of Washington, before this chapter takes effect, shall have filed or purported or attempted to file a petition under the provisions of chapter IX of the federal bankruptcy act, or shall have taken or purported or attempted to take any other proceedings under or in contemplation of proceedings under the provisions of said chapter IX, then and in every such case all acts and proceedings of such taxing district, in connection with such petition or proceedings, are hereby, to all intents and purposes, declared as legal and valid as though taken after the *effective date of this chapter.

[ 1935 c 143 s 10; RRS s 5608-10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "effective date of this chapter" was March 21, 1935.